District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.09

Schedule IV tests.

The Mayor shall place a substance in Schedule IV if the Mayor finds that:

(1)

The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in Schedule III;

(2)

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or the District of Columbia; and

(3)

The abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to the substances in Schedule III.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 209, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-519.